Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-301
Patrolling; activities authorized.

It shall be lawful for Boy Scout council, board of directors, scout executive, or others having the management or control of Boy Scouts, and those having charge of juniors in similar organizations not organized for pecuniary gain or profit, to permit boys in such organizations to render service patrolling streets or grounds; and to aid in the maintenance of order at public gatherings, such as state, city, fair association, school, or any other gatherings at which it may be deemed expedient to have the service of such boys.

Laws 1923, c. 127, § 1, p. 314;

C.S.1929, § 43-301;

R.S.1943, § 43-301.